Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2675HH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 541 Section 1. Section 423.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 68A. The sales price from the sale of 3 firearms, firearm ammunition, firearm accessories, and gun 4 safes, if the sale takes place on July 3, July 4, or July 5. 5